Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-230
Records required.

Sellers shall maintain records for twenty-four months in compliance with 16 C.F.R. 310.5, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2002.

Laws 1999, LB 469, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-2009;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 92.